Illinois, session 104th, HB3459.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Minimum Wage Law is amended by changing 5Sections 4 and 4a as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 105/4)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1004)7    Sec. 4. (a)(1) Every employer shall pay to each of his 8employees in every occupation wages of not less than $2.30 per 9hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 10not less than $1.95 per hour, except as provided in Sections 5 11and 6 of this Act, and on and after January 1, 1984, every 12employer shall pay to each of his employees in every 13occupation wages of not less than $2.65 per hour or in the case 14of employees under 18 years of age wages of not less than $2.25 15per hour, and on and after October 1, 1984 every employer shall 16pay to each of his employees in every occupation wages of not 17less than $3.00 per hour or in the case of employees under 18 18years of age wages of not less than $2.55 per hour, and on or 19after July 1, 1985 every employer shall pay to each of his 20employees in every occupation wages of not less than $3.35 per 21hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 22not less than $2.85 per hour, and from January 1, 2004 through 23December 31, 2004 every employer shall pay to each of his or   HB3459- 2 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 2occupation wages of not less than $5.50 per hour, and from 3January 1, 2005 through June 30, 2007 every employer shall pay 4to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older 5in every occupation wages of not less than $6.50 per hour, and 6from July 1, 2007 through June 30, 2008 every employer shall 7pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 8older in every occupation wages of not less than $7.50 per 9hour, and from July 1, 2008 through June 30, 2009 every 10employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 11years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 12than $7.75 per hour, and from July 1, 2009 through June 30, 132010 every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees 14who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation wages of 15not less than $8.00 per hour, and from July 1, 2010 through 16December 31, 2019 every employer shall pay to each of his or 17her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 18occupation wages of not less than $8.25 per hour, and from 19January 1, 2020 through June 30, 2020, every employer shall 20pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 21older in every occupation wages of not less than $9.25 per 22hour, and from July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 every 23employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 24years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 25than $10 per hour, and from January 1, 2021 through December 2631, 2021 every employer shall pay to each of his or her   HB3459- 3 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1employees who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation 2wages of not less than $11 per hour, and from January 1, 2022 3through December 31, 2022 every employer shall pay to each of 4his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 5occupation wages of not less than $12 per hour, and from 6January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023 every employer shall 7pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 8older in every occupation wages of not less than $13 per hour, 9and from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024, every 10employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 11years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 12than $14 per hour; and on and after January 1, 2025, every 13employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 14years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 15than $15 per hour.16    (2) Unless an employee's wages are reduced under Section 176, then in lieu of the rate prescribed in item (1) of this 18subsection (a), an employer may pay an employee who is 18 years 19of age or older, during the first 90 consecutive calendar days 20after the employee is initially employed by the employer, a 21wage that is not more than 50¢ less than the wage prescribed in 22item (1) of this subsection (a); however, an employer shall 23pay not less than the rate prescribed in item (1) of this 24subsection (a) to:25        (A) a day or temporary laborer, as defined in Section 26    5 of the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, who is 18   HB3459- 4 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1    years of age or older; and2        (B) an employee who is 18 years of age or older and 3    whose employment is occasional or irregular and requires 4    not more than 90 days to complete. 5    (3) At no time on or before December 31, 2019 shall the 6wages paid to any employee under 18 years of age be more than 750¢ less than the wage required to be paid to employees who are 8at least 18 years of age under item (1) of this subsection (a). 9Beginning on January 1, 2020, every employer shall pay to each 10of his or her employees who is under 18 years of age that has 11worked more than 650 hours for the employer during any 12calendar year a wage not less than the wage required for 13employees who are 18 years of age or older under paragraph (1) 14of subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act. Every employer 15shall pay to each of his or her employees who is under 18 years 16of age that has not worked more than 650 hours for the employer 17during any calendar year: (1) $8 per hour from January 1, 2020 18through December 31, 2020; (2) $8.50 per hour from January 1, 192021 through December 31, 2021; (3) $9.25 per hour from 20January 1, 2022 through December 31, 2022; (4) $10.50 per hour 21from January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023; (5) $12 per 22hour from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024; and (6) 23$13 per hour on and after January 1, 2025. 24    (b) No employer shall discriminate between employees on 25the basis of sex or mental or physical disability, except as 26otherwise provided in this Act by paying wages to employees at   HB3459- 5 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1a rate less than the rate at which he pays wages to employees 2for the same or substantially similar work on jobs the 3performance of which requires equal skill, effort, and 4responsibility, and which are performed under similar working 5conditions, except where such payment is made pursuant to (1) 6a seniority system; (2) a merit system; (3) a system which 7measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; or (4) 8a differential based on any other factor other than sex or 9mental or physical disability, except as otherwise provided in 10this Act.11    (c) Every employer of an employee engaged in an occupation 12in which gratuities have customarily and usually constituted 13and have been recognized as part of the remuneration for hire 14purposes is entitled to an allowance for gratuities as part of 15the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, subsection (a) in 16an amount not to exceed 40% of the applicable minimum wage 17rate. The Director shall require each employer desiring an 18allowance for gratuities to provide substantial evidence that 19the amount claimed, which may not exceed 40% of the applicable 20minimum wage rate, was received by the employee in the period 21for which the claim of exemption is made, and no part thereof 22was returned to the employer.23    (d) No camp counselor who resides on the premises of a 24seasonal camp of an organized not-for-profit corporation shall 25be subject to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor (1) 26works 40 or more hours per week, and (2) receives a total   HB3459- 6 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1weekly salary of not less than the adult minimum wage for a 240-hour week. If the counselor works less than 32 40 hours per 3week, the counselor shall be paid the minimum hourly wage for 4each hour worked. Every employer of a camp counselor under 5this subsection is entitled to an allowance for meals and 6lodging as part of the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, 7subsection (a), in an amount not to exceed 25% of the minimum 8wage rate.9    (e) A camp counselor employed at a day camp is not subject 10to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor is paid a 11stipend on a onetime or periodic basis and, if the camp 12counselor is a minor, the minor's parent, guardian or other 13custodian has consented in writing to the terms of payment 14before the commencement of such employment.15(Source: P.A. 101-1, eff. 2-19-19.) 16    (820 ILCS 105/4a)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1004a)17    Sec. 4a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 18no employer shall employ any of his employees for a workweek of 19more than 32 40 hours unless such employee receives 20compensation for his employment in excess of the hours above 21specified at a rate not less than 1 1/2 times the regular rate 22at which he is employed.23    (2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this Section are 24not applicable to:25        A. Any salesman or mechanic primarily engaged in   HB3459- 7 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1    selling or servicing automobiles, trucks or farm 2    implements, if he is employed by a nonmanufacturing 3    establishment primarily engaged in the business of selling 4    such vehicles or implements to ultimate purchasers.5        B. Any salesman primarily engaged in selling trailers, 6    boats, or aircraft, if he is employed by a 7    nonmanufacturing establishment primarily engaged in the 8    business of selling trailers, boats, or aircraft to 9    ultimate purchasers.10        C. Any employer of agricultural labor, with respect to 11    such agricultural employment.12        D. Any employee of a governmental body excluded from 13    the definition of "employee" under paragraph (e)(2)(C) of 14    Section 3 of the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.15        E. Any employee employed in a bona fide executive, 16    administrative or professional capacity, including any 17    radio or television announcer, news editor, or chief 18    engineer, as defined by or covered by the Federal Fair 19    Labor Standards Act of 1938 and the rules adopted under 20    that Act, as both exist on March 30, 2003, but compensated 21    at the amount of salary specified in subsections (a) and 22    (b) of Section 541.600 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal 23    Regulations as proposed in the Federal Register on March 24    31, 2003 or a greater amount of salary as may be adopted by 25    the United States Department of Labor. For bona fide 26    executive, administrative, and professional employees of   HB3459- 8 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1    not-for-profit corporations, the Director may, by 2    regulation, adopt a weekly wage rate standard lower than 3    that provided for executive, administrative, and 4    professional employees covered under the Fair Labor 5    Standards Act of 1938, as now or hereafter amended.6        F. Any commissioned employee as described in paragraph 7    (i) of Section 7 of the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 8    1938 and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as 9    now or hereafter amended.10        G. Any employment of an employee in the stead of 11    another employee of the same employer pursuant to a 12    worktime exchange agreement between employees.13        H. Any employee of a not-for-profit educational or 14    residential child care institution who (a) on a daily 15    basis is directly involved in educating or caring for 16    children who (1) are orphans, foster children, abused, 17    neglected or abandoned children, or are otherwise homeless 18    children and (2) reside in residential facilities of the 19    institution and (b) is compensated at an annual rate of 20    not less than $13,000 or, if the employee resides in such 21    facilities and receives without cost board and lodging 22    from such institution, not less than $10,000.23        I. Any employee employed as a crew member of any 24    uninspected towing vessel, as defined by Section 2101(40) 25    of Title 46 of the United States Code, operating in any 26    navigable waters in or along the boundaries of the State   HB3459- 9 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1    of Illinois.2        J. Any employee who is a member of a bargaining unit 3    recognized by the Illinois Labor Relations Board and whose 4    union has contractually agreed to an alternate shift 5    schedule as allowed by subsection (b) of Section 7 of the 6    Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938. 7    (3) Any employer may employ any employee for a period or 8periods of not more than 10 hours in the aggregate in any 9workweek in excess of the maximum hours specified in 10subsection (1) of this Section without paying the compensation 11for overtime employment prescribed in subsection (1) if during 12that period or periods the employee is receiving remedial 13education that:14        (a) is provided to employees who lack a high school 15    diploma or educational attainment at the eighth grade 16    level;17        (b) is designed to provide reading and other basic 18    skills at an eighth grade level or below; and19        (c) does not include job specific training.20    (4) A governmental body is not in violation of subsection 21(1) if the governmental body provides compensatory time 22pursuant to paragraph (o) of Section 7 of the Federal Fair 23Labor Standards Act of 1938, as now or hereafter amended, or is 24engaged in fire protection or law enforcement activities and 25meets the requirements of paragraph (k) of Section 7 or 26paragraph (b)(20) of Section 13 of the Federal Fair Labor   HB3459- 10 -LRB104 09865 SPS 19933 b1Standards Act of 1938, as now or hereafter amended. 2(Source: P.A. 99-17, eff. 1-1-16.)